Alaska, session 34, SB180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 44.83.085 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 06 (b) To the maximum extent feasible, the authority shall proceed with the 07 development of the Susitna River power project. 08 * Sec. 2. AS 42.05.711(v) is repealed. 09 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.